Washington statutes.
RCW 36.120.045

Planning committee—State route No. 520 improvements.

The planning committee must develop and include in the regional transportation investment plan a funding proposal for the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project that assures full project funding for seismic safety and corridor connectivity on state route number 520 between Interstate 5 and Interstate 405.

[ 2006 c 311 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 311: See note following RCW 36.120.020.